Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB973.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Chapter 23 of Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER DMUNICIPAL POLICE ENHANCEMENT AND CONSOLIDATION GRANT PROGRAMSec.2351. Definitions.2352. Establishment of program.2353. Publication and notice of program.2354. Award of grants.2355 2353 . Applications for grants. <--<--<--<--<--12345678910111213141516171819 2354. REVIEW PROCESS.2356. Accreditation or consolidation incentives.2355. AWARD OF GRANTS.2356. LIMITATIONS.2357 2357 . Municipal Police Enhancement AND Consolidation Grant Program Fund.2358. REPORT.§ 2351. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"ACCREDITATION." THE CERTIFICATION OF A POLICE DEPARTMENT BY THE PENNSYLVANIA LAW ENFORCEMENT ACCREDITATION COMMISSION OR ANOTHER RECOGNIZED ACCREDITING BODY, AFFIRMING THAT THE POLICE DEPARTMENT MEETS ESTABLISHED PROFESSIONAL STANDARDS AND BEST PRACTICES FOR LAW ENFORCEMENT OPERATIONS."APPLICANT." A MUNICIPALITY OR POLICE DEPARTMENT THAT SUBMITS AN APPLICATION."Application." An application submitted under section 2355(c) 2353(B) (relating to applications for grants) for a grant under the program."Commission." The Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency."Consolidation." The process of consolidating two or more municipal police departments under Subchapter A (relating to intergovernmental cooperation) or by a contract for services."Fund." The Municipal Police Enhancement AND Consolidation Grant Program Fund established under section 2357(a) (relating to Municipal Police Enhancement AND Consolidation Grant Program Fund).20250HB0973PN3315 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Municipal police department." A police department that has been organized and established by a municipality."MUNICIPAL POLICE OFFICER." A FULL-TIME OR PART-TIME EMPLOYEE OF A MUNICIPALITY WHO IS EMPOWERED TO ENFORCE THE LAWS OF THIS COMMONWEALTH AND THE RULES OF THE GOVERNING BODY OF THE MUNICIPALITY."Municipality." A city of the second class A, city of the third class, borough, township of the first class or township of the second class . , BOROUGH, INCORPORATED TOWN OR HOME RULE MUNICIPALITY."POLICE DEPARTMENT." A PUBLIC AGENCY OF A MUNICIPALITY HAVING GENERAL POLICE POWERS AND CHARGED WITH MAKING ARRESTS IN CONNECTION WITH THE ENFORCEMENT OF CRIMINAL OR TRAFFIC LAWS. THE TERM INCLUDES A REGIONAL POLICE DEPARTMENT FROM WHICH A MUNICIPALITY RECEIVES POLICE SERVICES OR A POLICE DEPARTMENT THAT PROVIDES THE MUNICIPALITY WITH POLICE SERVICES UNDER AN AGREEMENT OR CONTRACT."Program." The Municipal Police Enhancement AND Consolidation Grant Program established under section 2352 (relating to establishment of program).§ 2352. Establishment of program.The Municipal Police Enhancement AND Consolidation Grant Program is established and shall be administered by the commission. Grants provided under the program shall be used to improve and enhance the capabilities of municipal police departments, incentivize VOLUNTARY consolidation and provide training and other appropriate resources to municipal police officers.§ 2353. Publication and notice of program.The commission shall transmit notice of the availability of 20250HB0973PN3315 - 3 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 grants under the program to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin within 120 days from June 30, 2026, for grants under the program for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and by August 8 for grants under the program for each fiscal year thereafter.§ 2354. Award of grants.(a) Authorization.--The commission may award grants under the program to municipal police departments for any of the following:(1) Consolidation and improvements to infrastructure, including expanding or modifying municipal police buildings for the purpose of consolidation.(2) Achieving accreditation standards of the International Association of Chiefs of Police.(3) Training and certification of municipal police officers.(4) Community outreach programs.(b) Additional grants.--A municipal police department with not more than 10 police officers shall be eligible to receive additional grants under the program in accordance with the certification bonus point system under section 2356 (relating to accreditation or consolidation incentives) for any of the following:(1) Consolidation.(2) Achieving accreditation standards of the International Association of Chiefs of Police.(c) Grant limits.--(1) A grant under the program shall be:(i) Not less than $5,000 nor more than $100,000 per 20250HB0973PN3315 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 municipal police department for the purpose of consolidation.(ii) Not less than $5,000 nor more than $50,000 per municipal police department for the purpose of achieving accreditation standards of the International Association of Chiefs of Police.(iii) Not less than $5,000 nor more than $15,000 per municipal police department for the purposes of training and certification of municipal police officers or for the purpose of community outreach programs.(2) Grants may be awarded on a pro rata basis if the total dollar amount of applications submitted under section 2355(c) (relating to applications for grants) exceeds the amount of money appropriated by the General Assembly for the program.§ 2355. Applications for grants.(a) Instructions.--Within 120 days of June 30, 2026, for applications for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and by September 1 for applications for each fiscal year thereafter, the commission shall provide written notice of the application instructions to the chief of each municipal police department or the chief executive of each municipality.(b) Applications.--Within 180 days of June 30, 2026, for applications for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and by October 1 for applications for each fiscal year thereafter, the commission shall provide applications to the chief of each municipal police department or the chief executive of each municipality.§ 2353. APPLICATIONS FOR GRANTS.(A) DUTY OF COMMISSION.--THE COMMISSION SHALL PRESCRIBE THE 20250HB0973PN3315 - 5 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 FORM AND MANNER IN WHICH AN APPLICATION MAY BE SUBMITTED TO RECEIVE A GRANT AWARD UNDER THE PROGRAM. (c) (B) Submission.--A municipal MUNICIPALITY OR police department seeking a grant under the program shall MUST submit TO THE COMMISSION a completed application to the commission within an application period prescribed by the commission. The application period shall remain open for 60 days each year. (d) Approval or disapproval.--The commission shall approve or disapprove an application received under subsection (c) within 120 days after the close of the application period. An application which has not been approved or disapproved by the commission within 120 days after the close of the application period shall be deemed approved.§ 2356. Accreditation or consolidation incentives.The commission shall establish a certification bonus point system to provide additional grant funding to a municipal police department which has achieved accreditation or consolidation. THAT SUPPORTS ACCREDITATION OR CONSOLIDATION GOALS. THE COMMISSION SHALL ACCEPT APPLICATIONS ON AN ANNUAL BASIS, PENDING THE AVAILABILITY OF FUNDING.§ 2354. REVIEW PROCESS.(A) DUTY OF COMMISSION.--THE COMMISSION SHALL REVIEW COMPLETED APPLICATIONS RECEIVED FROM ELIGIBLE APPLICANTS IN CONSULTATION WITH THE GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF HOMELAND SECURITY, THE PENNSYLVANIA STATE POLICE AND THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT.(B) GEOGRAPHIC DIVERSITY.--THE COMMISSION SHALL ENSURE THAT GRANT AWARDS MADE UNDER THE PROGRAM ARE GEOGRAPHICALLY DISPERSED THROUGHOUT THIS COMMONWEALTH.§ 2355. AWARD OF GRANTS.20250HB0973PN3315 - 6 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE COMMISSION MAY ISSUE A GRANT AWARD TO AN APPLICANT FOR ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:(1) COSTS RELATED TO THE CONSOLIDATION OF POLICE SERVICES, INCLUDING SHARED EQUIPMENT, VEHICLES AND UNIFORMS, AS WELL AS REASONABLE MODIFICATIONS TO SHARE POLICE FACILITIES TO SUPPORT JOINT OPERATIONS.(2) PERSONNEL, INCLUDING SWORN OFFICERS, AND NONSWORN CIVILIANS, NECESSARY FOR ACCREDITATION OR CONSOLIDATION.(3) TECHNOLOGY AND INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY IMPROVEMENTS, INCLUDING RECORD MANAGEMENT SYSTEMS, REPORT MANAGEMENT SYSTEMS AND NATIONAL INCIDENT-BASED REPORTING SYSTEM UPDATES.(4) HARDWARE AND SOFTWARE EQUIPMENT, INCLUDING BODY-WORN CAMERAS, VEHICLE CAMERAS AND MOBILE INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY EQUIPMENT.(5) DEVELOPMENT AND IMPLEMENTATION OF POLICIES AND PROCEDURES ALIGNED WITH ACCREDITATION REQUIREMENTS AND EVIDENCE-BASED PRACTICES.(6) COMMUNITY ENGAGEMENT AND CRIME PREVENTION PROGRAMS RESPONSIVE TO LOCAL PUBLIC SAFETY NEEDS AND DEVELOPED IN COLLABORATION WITH LOCAL STAKEHOLDERS.(7) ANY OTHER ELIGIBLE ACTIVITY THAT DIRECTLY SUPPORTS ACCREDITATION OR CONSOLIDATION GOALS.§ 2356. LIMITATIONS.(A) GRANT AMOUNT.--A GRANT UNDER THE PROGRAM MAY NOT EXCEED $100,000 FOR ELIGIBLE ACTIVITIES UNDER SECTION 2355 (RELATING TO AWARD OF GRANTS).(B) PROGRAM AWARDS.--GRANTS MAY BE AWARDED ON A PRO RATA BASIS IF THE TOTAL DOLLAR AMOUNT OF APPLICATIONS SUBMITTED EXCEEDS THE AMOUNT OF MONEY APPROPRIATED FOR THE PROGRAM.(C) RESTRICTION ON USAGE OF GRANT MONEY.--20250HB0973PN3315 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) GRANT MONEY ALLOCATED UNDER THE PROGRAM SHALL BE USED TO SUPPLEMENT AND NOT SUPPLANT EXISTING FUNDING.(2) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT A POLICE DEPARTMENT FROM MAKING AN APPLICATION TO RECEIVE A GRANT AWARD UNDER THE PROGRAM IN A SUBSEQUENT YEAR FOR THE SAME PURPOSE AND AMOUNT IN THE PRIOR YEAR. § 2357. Municipal Police Enhancement AND Consolidation Grant Program Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Municipal Police Enhancement AND Consolidation Grant Program Fund is established as a separate fund in the State Treasury for the purpose of making grants under the program.(b) Funding.--Grants under the program may be awarded from money appropriated, allocated or otherwise made available to the fund.(c) Continuing appropriation.--All money deposited into the fund and all interest accrued is appropriated to the commission on a continuing basis for the purposes provided under this section.(d) Administration.-- The commission may not allocate more than $500,000 of money in the fund for the administrative costs of the program.(e) Grant allocations.--After payment of administrative costs under subsection (d), the money in the fund shall be allocated as follows:(1) Twenty-five percent of the money shall be used for grants to municipal police departments that have achieved consolidation.(2) Seventy-five percent of the money shall be used for grants to municipal police departments for the following 20250HB0973PN3315 - 8 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 purposes:(i) Achieving accreditation standards of the International Association of Chiefs of Police.(ii) Training and certification of municipal police officers.(iii) Community outreach programs. THE COMMISSION MAY NOT EXPEND MORE THAN 3% OF MONEY APPROPRIATED TO THE COMMISSION FOR THE PROGRAM ON ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENSES.§ 2358. REPORT.BY DECEMBER 31 FOLLOWING THE END OF THE THIRD FISCAL YEAR OF GRANT AVAILABILITY, THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT COMMISSION SHALL DEVELOP A WRITTEN REPORT ON THE FUNDING AND EFFECTIVENESS OF THE PROGRAM. THE COMMISSION AND GRANTEES SHALL PROVIDE THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT COMMISSION WITH ALL REQUESTED DOCUMENTATION RELATED TO THE STUDY.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0973PN3315 - 9 - <--12345678910111213141516